Louisiana, session 2026, HB856.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(34) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(34) R.S. 48:255.1 R.S. 48:250.5, 255.1
* * *
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 856 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 48:250.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§250.5. Indefinite Delivery, Indefinite Quantity construction contracts
A. The legislature declares it to be in the public interest to increase
efficiency and improve operational readiness in the construction and maintenance
of state highways and bridges. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the requirements of this Part, if the secretary or the executive director of
the office of Louisiana highway construction determines it is in the best interest of
the public, the department or office of Louisiana highway construction may
respectively procure and award indefinite delivery, indefinite quantity construction
contracts pursuant to the requirements of this Section for the maintenance,
preservation, reconstruction, rehabilitation, repair, and construction projects let by
the department and the office of Louisiana highway construction, respectively, and
related incidental work.
B. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Best value" means a selection process in which proposals contain price
and qualitative components and award of one or multiple of the Indefinite Delivery,
Indefinite Quantity contract is based upon a combination of price and qualitative
considerations as provided in the solicitation documents.
(2) "Indefinite Delivery, Indefinite Quantity (ID/IQ)" means a method of
contracting that allows for delivery of an indefinite quantity of services over a fixed
duration under which delivery of specific construction and construction-related
services is authorized by work orders.
(3) "Indefinite Delivery, Indefinite Quantity (ID/IQ) construction contract"
means the principal contract awarded to an ID/IQ contractor pursuant to the
requirements of this Section.
(4) "Low bid" means a selection process in which proposals are evaluated
based on the proposed price from the lowest responsible bidder.
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 856 ENROLLED
(5) "Multiple award" means an ID/IQ procurement where awards of ID/IQ
construction contracts for the same scope of services are made to multiple ID/IQ
contractors through a single procurement.
(6) "Single award" means an ID/IQ procurement where award of the ID/IQ
construction contract is made to a single ID/IQ contractor.
(7) "Work order" means a contract document issued for a definite scope of
work pursuant to an ID/IQ construction contract. A work order shall provide the
location, time, and scope of work required and authorizes the ID/IQ contractor to
deliver the scope of services described in the work order. It also provides required
pay items, quantities, and unit prices, as applicable.
C. For federal aid projects, the department and the office of Louisiana
highway construction, respectively, shall comply with all federal laws and
regulations that are conditions to federal participation, including but not limited to
provisions of 2 CFR 200 and 23 CFR Part 635, Subpart F, as amended. In the event
of a conflict between applicable required federal laws or regulations and the
provisions of Title 48 and any state rules or regulations, the federal laws or
regulations shall control on federal aid projects.
D. Procurements pursuant to this Section may include single award or
multiple award ID/IQ construction contracts. The legislature authorizes the
department and the office of Louisiana highway construction to procure ID/IQ
contracts using low bid and best value methods, and to award such contracts and any
resulting work orders using low bid or best value, as specified in the solicitation
documents. All procurement documents issued by the department and the office of
Louisiana highway construction, respectively, including the NOI and RFP, shall
indicate whether a single award or multiple awards will be made. Materials
separately acquired by the department or office of Louisiana highway construction
may be provided to contractors for use under and as a condition of any ID/IQ
contract.
E. Procurement and award of ID/IQ construction contacts shall meet the
following requirements:
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 856 ENROLLED
(1) Single award ID/IQ construction contracts procured on a low-bid basis
may be advertised and awarded using one of the following methods:
(a) In accordance with R.S. 48:252 and 255 for award to the lowest
responsive and responsible bidder.
(b) In accordance with the advertisement and award procedures set forth in
this Section.
(2) Multiple-award ID/IQ construction contracts may be procured on a low
bid or best value basis, as determined by the department and office of Louisiana
highway construction, respectively. Such procurements shall be conducted in
accordance with applicable Louisiana public bid and procurement laws including the
requirements for advertisements and the procedures set forth in this Section.
(3)(a) The procurement of any multiple-award ID/IQ construction contract
or a single award ID/IQ construction contract not advertised and awarded pursuant
to R.S. 48:252 and 255, shall commence with the department and the office of
Louisiana highway construction, respectively, issuing a "notice of intent" (NOI)
through advertisement on their designated webpages to request letters of interest
(LOI). The NOI shall be advertised for at least ten business days prior to the deadline
for submission of LOI and shall include a description of the ID/IQ services to be
procured. The department and the office of Louisiana highway construction may also
readvertise the NOI using additional media or publications and may readvertise as
necessary if the number of responses received is deemed insufficient to ensure
adequate competition.
(b) After the deadline for submission of LOI for a single-award or
multiple-award ID/IQ construction contract, the department and office of Louisiana
highway construction shall issue a Request for Proposals ("RFP") to all contractors
that submitted an LOI. The RFP shall include instructions for proposal preparation
and submission, a description of the evaluation methodology, and shall comply with
the requirements of this Section.
(c) Bid bonds in accordance with R.S. 48:253 shall be specified in the
department and the office of Louisiana highway construction's standard
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 856 ENROLLED
specifications or special provisions. The department and the office of Louisiana
highway construction may waive the requirement for bid bonds for procurements
under this Section.
(4)(a) The assistant secretary for project delivery, with the concurrence of
the secretary or designee, and the executive director of the office of Louisiana
highway construction , respectively, shall establish an evaluation committee for
evaluation of proposals received in response to the RFP. The evaluation committee
may, in its discretion, be assisted by other departments and office of Louisiana
highway construction personnel and external advisors in the evaluation the
proposals.
(b) The evaluation committee shall evaluate the proposals and make a
recommendation of award to the secretary and executive director. The secretary,
executive director, or their designees, shall make the final determination of award.
(5) Prior to issuing a work order under a multiple-award ID/IQ construction
contract, the department and the office of Louisiana highway construction,
respectively, shall solicit competitive responses from the contractors awarded ID/IQ
contracts under the solicitation in accordance with procedures set forth in the ID/IQ
construction contract. The procurement documents or contract shall state the
procedures and selection criteria for issuance of work orders. Work orders shall be
awarded on a competitive low bid basis, or, where permitted by applicable law and
approved for use with federal funds, on a best value basis in which price is a
significant evaluation factor.
(6) Proposals received by the department and the office of Louisiana
highway construction and the evaluation committee's records, including the
evaluation committee's findings, grading, score sheets, and recommendations, shall
not be public records until the ID/IQ construction contract has been fully executed
or the procurement has been cancelled. Following contract execution or cancellation,
such records shall be subject to disclosure in accordance with applicable public
records laws. Proprietary, confidential, trade secret, or otherwise protected
information will remain exempt to the extent permitted by law. The meetings of the
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 856 ENROLLED
evaluation committee will not be subject to the Open Meetings Law in Title 44 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes.
F. The department and the office of Louisiana highway construction may
include the following items in their procurement documents or contracts:
(1) The method for determining price escalation or de-escalation procedures
when warranted by particular circumstances.
(2) Special provisions specific to ID/IQ construction contracts.
(3) Unit pricing or lists of work items specific to the ID/IQ construction
contract.
(4) A minimum quantity or dollar value if the department and the office of
Louisiana highway construction opts to set a minimum.
(5) A statement of procedures and selection criteria the department and
office of Louisiana highway construction shall use in issuing work orders.
(6) Any other information, terms, or requirements the department and the
office of Louisiana highway construction deem necessary to include in procurement
documents or contracts.
G. The term of the initial ID/IQ construction contract and any optional
contract extensions shall not exceed five years. The duration of the initial term and
the terms of individual contract extensions shall be determined by the department
and the office of Louisiana highway construction, respectively. The ID/IQ
construction contract shall serve as the underlying agreement that establishes the
general terms and conditions governing the relationship between the department and
the office of Louisiana highway construction, respectively, and the selected bidder.
Execution of the ID/IQ construction contract shall not authorize work or serve as a
notice to proceed.
H. Payment bonds under R.S. 48:256.3, performance bonds under R.S.
48:255(D), retainage bonds under R.S. 48:256.1, the minimum required warranty
period under R.S. 48:251, and the general requirements of Part XIII of Chapter 1 of
this Title shall apply to the value and completion of work under an individual work
order rather than the value and completion of all work under the ID/IQ construction
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 856 ENROLLED
contract unless otherwise specified in the ID/IQ construction contract or the
individual work order, or otherwise provided in a special provision of the department
and the office of Louisiana highway construction, respectively. The issuance of
payment, performance, and retainage bonds shall be required at the time of execution
of an individual work order unless otherwise specified by the ID/IQ construction
contract, the individual work order, or a special provision developed by the
department and the office of Louisiana highway construction, respectively.
Stipulated damages apply to individual work orders and shall be calculated by the
required completion date of an individual work order. Required insurance policies
and the extent and type of coverage required shall be as determined by the
department and the office of Louisiana highway construction, respectively. This
Subsection shall also apply to low bid ID/IQ contracts as advertised and awarded
pursuant to R.S. 48:252 and R.S. 48:255.
I. This Section shall not apply to engineering and design service contracts
or other consulting contracts of the department and the office of Louisiana highway
construction, respectively, authorized by this Part or federal aid projects governed
by 23 CFR Part 172, except that these services may be included in ID/IQ
construction contracts to the extent that they support the construction of projects.
J. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the provisions of this Part
shall apply to ID/IQ construction contracting. In the event of a conflict, the
provisions of this Section shall prevail and shall supersede any conflicting provision
of state law.
K. The department and the office of Louisiana highway construction,
respectively, may establish guidelines, standard specifications, special provisions,
handbooks, or other required documents for elements of ID/IQ construction phase
contracting not explicitly provided for in this Section or otherwise subject to the
Administrative Procedure Act.
L. The department and the office of Louisiana highway construction,
respectively, may promulgate rules and regulations to implement and enforce the
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 856 ENROLLED
provisions of this Section in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative
Procedure Act.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.